Louisiana, session 2026, HB239.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4720.151(L)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4720.151. East Baton Rouge Redevelopment Authority
* * *
L.
* * *
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the
authority sells immovable property to a nonprofit entity or a political subdivision of
the state that is intended for a public purpose or for use in a redevelopment area and
the property was acquired by the authority with public funds, the final sales price
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 239
shall not exceed one hundred ten percent of the amount that was paid by the
authority to acquire the property.
* * *